California, session 20252026, SB366.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12815.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:12815.5. (a) The Department of General Services shall contract with the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Center to conduct a study evaluating the impact of artificial intelligence on worker well-being, job quality, job types, different populations, and state revenues.(b) On or before June 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report of the findings of the study described in subdivision (a) to the Legislature. Legislature, and shall file a notice with the Secretary of State indicating the date upon which the study was submitted.(c) The report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d) This section shall be repealed upon submission of the report to the Legislature.